Washington statutes.
RCW 19.182.200

Security freeze—Exempt entities.

The following entities are not required to place a security freeze in a consumer credit report under RCW 19.182.170:

(1) A check services or fraud prevention services company, which issues reports on incidents of fraud or authorizations for the purpose of approving or processing negotiable instruments, electronic funds transfers, or similar methods of payments; and

(2) A deposit account information service company, which issues reports regarding account closures due to fraud, substantial overdrafts, ATM abuse, or similar negative information regarding a consumer, to inquiring banks or other financial institutions for use only in reviewing a consumer request for a deposit account at the inquiring bank or financial institution.

[ 2005 c 342 s 4.]